Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COMO COMMUNITY CENTER; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $995,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Como Community Center to construct, furnish, and equip improvements to renovate and repurpose the historic Como Congregational Church in the city of Minneapolis to serve as a community center, public meeting space, and auditorium available for public use. Up to $100,000 of this appropriation may be used to reimburse the Como Community Center for costs incurred after October 1, 2024, for this project. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end